Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.106

Professional development program to support evaluation systems—Duties of the office of the superintendent of public instruction—Website with professional development materials.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop and make available a professional development program to support the implementation of the evaluation systems required by RCW 28A.405.100. The program components may be organized into professional development modules for principals, administrators, and teachers. The professional development program shall include a comprehensive online training package.

(2) The training program must include, but not be limited to, the following topics:

(a) Introduction of the evaluation criteria for teachers and principals and the four-level rating system;

(b) Orientation to and use of instructional frameworks;

(c) Orientation to and use of the leadership frameworks;

(d) Best practices in developing and using data in the evaluation systems, including multiple measures, student growth data, classroom observations, and other measures and evidence;

(e) Strategies for achieving maximum rater agreement;

(f) Evaluator feedback protocols in the evaluation systems;

(g) Examples of high quality teaching and leadership; and

(h) Methods to link the evaluation process to ongoing educator professional development.

(3) The training program must also include the foundational elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition, including information regarding best practices to implement the tribal history and culture curriculum. The content of the training must be aligned with the standards of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the Washington professional educator standards board, the steering committee established in RCW 28A.405.100, and the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, must integrate the content for cultural competence into the overall training for principals, administrators, and teachers to support the revised evaluation systems.

(4) To the maximum extent feasible, the professional development program must incorporate or adapt existing online training or curriculum, including securing materials or curriculum under contract or purchase agreements within available funds. Multiple modes of instruction should be incorporated including videos of classroom teaching, participatory exercises, and other engaging combinations of online audio, video, and print presentation.

(5) The professional development program must be developed in modules that allow:

(a) Access to material over a reasonable number of training sessions;

(b) Delivery in person or online; and

(c) Use in a self-directed manner.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must maintain a website that includes the online professional development materials along with sample evaluation forms and templates, links to relevant research on evaluation and on high quality teaching and leadership, samples of contract and collective bargaining language on key topics, examples of multiple measures of teacher and principal performance, suggestions for data to measure student growth, and other tools that will assist school districts in implementing the revised evaluation systems.

(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must identify the number of in-service training hours associated with each professional development module and develop a way for users to document their completion of the training. Documented completion of the training under this section is considered approved in-service training for the purposes of *RCW 28A.415.020.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall periodically update the modules to reflect new topics and research on performance evaluation so that the training serves as an ongoing source of continuing education and professional development.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with the educational service districts to provide clearinghouse services for the identification and publication of professional development opportunities for teachers and principals that align with performance evaluation criteria.

[ 2021 c 197 s 10; 2016 c 72 s 202; 2012 c 35 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.415.020 was repealed by 2018 c 266 s 411.

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.